Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2537.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144G.70, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Initial reviews, assessments, and monitoring. (a) Residents who are not receiving any assisted living services shall not be required to undergo an initial nursing assessment. (b) An assisted living facility shall conduct a nursing assessment by a registered nurse of the physical and cognitive needs of the prospective resident and propose a temporary service plan prior to the date on which a prospective resident executes a contract with a facility or the date on which a prospective resident moves in, whichever is earlier. If necessitated by either the geographic distance between the prospective resident and the facility, or urgent or unexpected circumstances, the assessment may be conducted using telecommunication methods based on practice standards that meet the resident's needs and reflect person-centered planning and care delivery. (c) Resident reassessment and monitoring must be conducted deleted text begin no more than 14 calendar days after initiation of services. Ongoing resident reassessment and monitoring must be conducted as needed based on changes in the needs of the resident and cannot exceed 90 calendar days from the last date of the assessmentdeleted text end new text begin by a registered nurse:new text end new text begin (1) no more than 14 calendar days after initiation of services; new text end new text begin (2) as needed based upon changes in the needs of the resident; new text end new text begin (3) not to exceed 180 calendar days; and new text end new text begin (4) annuallynew text end . new text begin (d) Focused assessments of the health status of the resident as described in section 148.171, subdivision 14, must be conducted by a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse to address Minnesota Rules, part 4659.0150, subpart 2, items B; D, subitems (2) to (4), unit (h), (7), and (8); E, subitems (2) and (3); F, subitem (2); G to L; and M, subitems (5) and (7) to (9), and be scheduled to not exceed 90 days since the last reassessment or focused assessment. Annual assessments conducted by a registered nurse may take the place of a scheduled 90-day reassessment. new text end deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end For residents only receiving assisted living services specified in section 144G.08, subdivision 9, clauses (1) to (5), the facility shall complete an individualized initial review of the resident's needs and preferences. The initial review must be completed within 30 calendar days of the start of services. Resident monitoring and review must be conducted as needed based on changes in the needs of the resident and cannot exceed 90 calendar days from the date of the last review. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end A facility must inform the prospective resident of the availability of and contact information for long-term care consultation services under section 256B.0911, prior to the date on which a prospective resident executes a contract with a facility or the date on which a prospective resident moves in, whichever is earlier.